District of Columbia statutes.
38-828.02

Applicability.

(a)

Subchapter II of this chapter shall apply as of August 1, 2010.

(b)

Repealed.

July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-209, § 802, 57 DCR 4779
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 7005, 57 DCR 6242
D.C. Law 18-223 repealed subsec. (b), which had read as follows: “(b) This chapter shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.”
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section 802(b) of D.C. Law 18-209, see § 7005 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).